California, session 20252026, AB1060.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8.6 (commencing with Section 17075.60) is added to Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to read: Article 8.6. School Wellness Centers17075.60. On and after July 1, 2027, all new construction projects submitted to the Division of the State Architect pursuant to this chapter shall include a dedicated space to be used as a school wellness center that shall be used to provide health support and resource referrals for pupils and staff.SECTION 1.(a)The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1)The cost of attorneys has increased substantially in the state over the past 30 years. Political subdivisions have retained attorneys at costs in excess of $2,000 per hour.(2)Without an appropriate check on the spending of public funds on attorneys, local governments have engaged in wasteful spending on attorneys for purposes not in the interests of their constituents, and oftentimes without the knowledge of those constituents or the governing boards of those local governments. The City of Santa Monica, for example, has expended in excess of $14,000,000 fighting against the voting rights of its constituents, while simultaneously eliminating recreation and library services due to budget shortfalls.(3)Disclosure to the public can deter wasteful spending by government at all levels(4)The provisions of this act concerning access of legislative body members to attorney invoices are declarative of existing law.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that public funds are not excessively spent, in secret, on attorneys, rather than on providing the essential services for which local governments are responsible.SEC. 2.Section 41804 of the Government Code is amended to read:41804.(a)The city attorney shall receive compensation as is allowed by the legislative body.(b)All invoices for work by the city attorney, or by any other attorney who is seeking, or has sought, compensation from a city, shall be made available, without redaction, to each member of the city council promptly upon that member’s request. A member of the city council who receives an invoice pursuant to this section shall maintain the confidentiality of any confidential information contained in the invoice.SEC. 3.Section 41806 is added to the Government Code, to read:41806.(a)A city shall prepare and update at least bimonthly a summary of all legal expenses incurred by the city. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the city shall publish the summary in a conspicuous location on its internet website and make the summary available for public inspection. The summary shall specify the aggregate amount paid to attorneys and consultants for legal work for each matter, and, for each matter, identify the attorney or law firm to whom those payments have been made.(b)This section does not require disclosure of legal fees related to a pending and active litigation matter or the disclosure of any other information protected by the attorney-client privilegeSEC. 4.Section 50079.7 is added to the Government Code, to read:50079.7.All invoices for work by any attorney who is seeking, or has sought, compensation from a school district or a community college district, shall be made available, without redaction, to each member of the governing board of the school district or community college district promptly upon that member’s request. A member of a governing board who receives an invoice pursuant to this section shall maintain the confidentiality of any confidential information contained in the invoice.SEC. 5.Section 50079.8 is added to the Government Code, to read:50079.8.(a)A school district or community college district shall prepare and update at least bimonthly a summary of all legal expenses incurred by the school district or community college district. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the school district or community college district shall publish the summary in a conspicuous location on its internet website and make the summary available for public inspection. The summary shall specify the aggregate amount paid to attorneys and consultants for legal work for each matter, and, for each matter, identify the attorney or law firm to whom those payments have been made.(b)This section does not require disclosure of legal fees related to a pending and active litigation matter or the disclosure of any other information protected by the attorney-client privilege.SEC. 6.The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 2 and 3 of this act amending Section 41804 of, and adding Section 41806 to, the Government Code address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 2 and 3 of this act apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 7.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.